Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
FOUNDATION GRANT PROGRAM

[§9-11] Qualifying standards for foundation
grant applications. An applicant for a foundation grant shall meet the
following standards:

(1) If the applicant is an organization:

(A) Be a for-profit organization incorporated
under the laws of the State or a nonprofit organization exempt from the federal
income tax by the Internal Revenue Service;

(B) In the case of a tax exempt nonprofit
organization, the organization shall have a governing board whose members have no
material conflict of interest and serve without compensation;

(C) Have bylaws or policies that describe the
manner in which business is conducted, prohibit nepotism, and provide for the
management of potential conflict of interest situations; and

(D) Have at least one year's experience with
the project or in the program or activity area for which the request for grant
is being made; provided that the foundation may grant an exception where the
requesting or proposing organization has demonstrated the necessary experience
in the program area.

(2) If the applicant is an individual, the applicant
must be determined by the foundation to be:

(A) Professionally recognized in the field of
culture and the arts or history and the humanities; and

(B) Qualified to carry out the activity or
program proposed for delivery to the general public or specified members of the
general public. [L 1992, c 181, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next